Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB313.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 96.010 is amended to read as follows:
(1) At least six (6)[eighteen (18)] months before the expiration of any franchise acquired under or prior to the
present Constitution, the legislative body of each city shall provide for the sale of a new franchise to the
highest and best bidder on terms that are fair and reasonable to the city, to the purchaser of the franchise and to
the patrons of the utility. The terms shall specify the quality of service to be rendered and, in cities of the first
class, the price that shall be charged for the service.
(2) If there is no public necessity for the kind of public utility in question and if the city desires to discontinue
entirely the kind of service in question, or if, in the case of cities other than those of the first class, the city
owns or desires to own and operate a municipal plant to render the required service, this section shall not
apply.
Signed by Governor April 13, 2026.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version